src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON V-ei
+V+Neg+Sg1:en   K_V-neg   ; ! en
+V+Neg+Sg2:et   K_V-neg   ;
+V+Neg+Sg3:ei    K_V-neg   ;
+V+Neg+Pl1:emmä  K_V-neg   ;
+V+Neg+Pl2:että  K_V-neg   ;
+V+Neg+Pl3:evät  K_V-neg   ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:elä   #  ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg3:elköö   #  ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:elkää   #  ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl3:elkööt   #  ;

LEXICON K_V-neg
+Foc/kä:kä # ;
 K_V   ;

LEXICON V-olla
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:oon	K_V   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:oot	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ono	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:on	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:oomma	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ootta	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ovat	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+4:ollaa	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:oo	K_V   ;

+V:oli IndPrt ; ! +Ind+Prt+Sg1:olin       K_V   ; ! oon
!!PL3 is not working
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:olivat     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:oltii     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:olt         #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+4:oltu         #   ;

+V+Pot+Sg1:leenen      #   ; ! oon
+V+Pot+Sg2:leenet      #   ;
+V+Pot+Sg3:leenöö      K_V   ;
+V+Pot+Pl1:leenemmä    #   ;
+V+Pot+Pl2:leenettä    #   ;
+V+Pot+Pl3:leenööt     K_V   ;
!+V+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
+V+Pot+ConNeg:lee                #   ;

+V:ol CondPers ; ! olisin
+V+Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
!+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

+V:ol ImprtPers_k ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
!+V+Imprt+Pl3:olisivat     #   ; ! laa ovat
+V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
!+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! Actor
+V:oli V-actor_jA ; !
+V:ole V-ActPrsPrc ; ! oleva
+V:ol V-ActPrtPrc_lt   ;
+V+PrsPrc:oltava   A-tulova   ;
+V+PrtPrc:oltu	A-oma   ; ! Check this
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:olemAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! olematoin

+V+Inf:olla             #   ;
+V+Inf:olema SG-ILL_V   ;
+V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
+V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
+V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
+V+Ger:olle		SG-INE   ;
+V+Der/miin:olemi N-inmihiin ;



LEXICON V-jäävvä
+V: V-jäävvä_01 ;

LEXICON V-jäävvä_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:n	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:t 	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:p	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>mmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>vAÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:%>vvAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:0		#   ;

:%>i%> IndPrt ;
!
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tii     #   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:tUY1         #   ;

:n PotPers ; ! jäänöö

!+V+Pot+4:      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

+Cond+Sg1:%>i%>sin      #   ; ! oon
+Cond+Sg2:%>i%>sit      #   ;
+Cond+Sg3:%>i%>s      #   ;
+Cond+Pl1:%>i%>simmAÄ1    #   ;
+Cond+Pl2:%>i%>sittAÄ1    #   ;
+Cond+Pl3:%>i%>sivAÄ1t     #   ;
+Cond+4:tAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
+V: ImprtPers_k ;
! 
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
 V-actor_jA ;
 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! jäävä
 V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; ! jäänt
! +V+Prc:oltava			       #   ;
+V+PrtPrc:tUY1		A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! jäämätöin
! 
+Inf:%>vvAÄ1             #   ;
+Inf:mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ;
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
+Inf+Abe:%>mAÄ1%>tAÄ1      #   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:mi N-inmihiin ; ! jäämiin

! käyvvä:kä
LEXICON V-käyvvä
+V: V-käyvvä_01 ;

LEXICON V-käyvvä_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:yn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:yt 	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:yp	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ymmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:yttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:yvAÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:yvvAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:y		#   ;

:vi IndPrt ;
!
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ytii     #   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:tUY1         #   ;

:yn PotPers ; ! jäänöö

!+V+Pot+4:      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

:v CondPers ;
!+Cond+Sg1:%>i%>sin      #   ; ! oon
!+Cond+Sg2:%>i%>sit      #   ;
!+Cond+Sg3:%>i%>s      #   ;
!+Cond+Pl1:%>i%>simmAÄ1    #   ;
!+Cond+Pl2:%>i%>sittAÄ1    #   ;
!+Cond+Pl3:%>i%>sivAÄ1t     #   ;
+Cond+4:ytAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
+V:y ImprtPers_k ;
! 
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:vi V-actor_jA ;
:y V-ActPrsPrc ; ! jäävä
:y V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; ! jäänt
! +V+Prc:oltava			       #   ;
+V+PrtPrc:ytUY1		A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:ymAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! jäämätöin
! 
+Inf:yvvAÄ1             #   ;
+Inf:ymAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ;
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
+Inf:ymAÄ1 SG-ABE ; ! käymätä
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:ymi N-inmihiin ; !käymiin


!tuuvva:too
LEXICON V-tuuvva
+V: V-tuuvva_01 ;

LEXICON V-tuuvva_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:n	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:t 	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:p	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:mmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:vAÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:vvAÄ1%^RVwsAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:		#   ;

:%>i%> IndPrt ;
!
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tii     #   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:tUY1         #   ;

:n PotPers ; ! jäänöö

+Pot+4:tAÄ1nOÖ1OÖ1      K_V   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:                #   ;

+Cond+Sg1:%>i%>sin      #   ; ! oon
+Cond+Sg2:%>i%>sit      #   ;
+Cond+Sg3:%>i%>s      #   ;
+Cond+Pl1:%>i%>simmAÄ1    #   ;
+Cond+Pl2:%>i%>sittAÄ1    #   ;
+Cond+Pl3:%>i%>sivAÄ1t     #   ;
+Cond+4:tAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
+V: ImprtPers_k ;
! 
+Imprt+Sg2:      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
 V-actor_jA ;
 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! jäävä
 V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; ! jäänt
! +V+Prc:oltava			       #   ;
+PrtPrc:tUY1		A-kova   ;
+Inf+Der/tOin:mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! jäämätöin
! 
+Inf:vvAÄ1%^RVws             #   ;
+Inf:mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ;
+Inf+Ine:mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:mAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:mi N-inmihiin ;


LEXICON V-voija
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:n	#   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:t 	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:p	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:pi	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:mmAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ttAÄ1	#   ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ovat	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+4:jAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:0		#   ;

+V: IndPrt ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:n       #   ; ! voin
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:t       #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i        K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>mmAÄ1     #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ttAÄ1     #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tii     #   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:tUY1         #   ;

:n PotPers ; ! voinoo
!+V+Pot+4:      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

+V+Cond+Sg1:sin      K_V   ; ! oon
+V+Cond+Sg2:sit      K_V   ;
+V+Cond+Sg3:s      K_V   ;
+V+Cond+Sg3:si      K_V   ;
+V+Cond+Pl1:simmAÄ1    K_V   ;
+V+Cond+Pl2:sittAÄ1    K_V   ;
+V+Cond+Pl3:sivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+V+Cond+4:tais      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

+V: ImprtPers_k ;
! 
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V: V-actor_jA ; !
+V: V-ActPrsPrc ; ! voiva
+V:	V-ActPrtPrc_nt   ; !voint
! +V+Prc:oltava			       #   ;
! +V+Prc:oltu			       #   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! voimatoin

+V+Inf:j%>AÄ1             #   ;
+V+Inf:mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ;
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
+V+Inf+Abe:%>mAÄ1%>tAÄ1      #   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
!+V+Der/miin:a%>mi N-inmihiin ;

LEXICON V-antaa
+V: V-antaa_01 ;
