src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ahavoija:ahavoi V-voija  "" ;
haravoija:haravoi V-voija  "" ;
juuvva:joo V-tuuvva  "" ;
tuuvva:too V-tuuvva  "" ;
syyvvä:söö V-tuuvva  "" ;
lyyvvä:löö V-tuuvva  "" ;
myyvvä:möö V-tuuvva  "" ;
luuvva:loo V-tuuvva  "" ;
käyvvä:kä V-käyvvä  "" ;
jäävvä:jää V-jäävvä  "" ;
veevvä:vee V-jäävvä  "" ;
toovva:too V-jäävvä  "" ;
saavva:saa V-jäävvä  "" ;
voija:voi V-voija  "" ;
antaa:ant V-antaa  "" ;
kantaa:kant V-antaa  "" ;
kaataa:kaat V-antaa  "" ;
kattaa:katt V-antaa  "" ;
alkaa:alk V-antaa  "" ;
vaihtaa:vaiht V-antaa  "" ;
kaivaa:kaiv V-antaa  "" ;
sataa:sat V-antaa  "" ;
mahtaa:maht V-antaa  "" ;
ajaa:aj V-antaa  "" ;
laulaa:laul V-antaa  "" ;
maksaa:maks V-antaa  "" ;
palaa:pal V-antaa  "" ;
tappaa:tapp V-antaa  "" ;
jakkaa:jak V-antaa  "" ;
kasvaa:kasv V-antaa  "" ;
olla:0 V-olla  "" ;
ei:0 V-ei  "" ;
